Massachusetts, session 194th, H1882.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10 of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2006 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Any person who displays, exhibits or sells their homemade or home grown products or
produce within the commonwealth at public farmers’ markets and farm stands shall be allowed
to provide customers with taste samples of their products without incurring any liability.
Conformity to sanitary health codes and requirements such as sinks and heating apparatus shall
not be applicable under this paragraph.
of 1